Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2704.68
Residential water service; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of residential water service.

Laws 2021, LB26, § 4.